Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.010

Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:

(1) "Assessment" means the regular collection, analysis, and sharing of information about health conditions, risks, and resources in a community. Assessment activities identify trends in illness, injury, and death and the factors that may cause these events. They also identify environmental risk factors, community concerns, community health resources, and the use of health services. Assessment includes gathering statistical data as well as conducting epidemiologic and other investigations and evaluations of health emergencies and specific ongoing health problems;

(2) "Board" means the state board of health;

(3) "Department" means the department of health;

(4) "Policy development" means the establishment of social norms, organizational guidelines, operational procedures, rules, ordinances, or statutes that promote health or prevent injury, illness, or death; and

(5) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.

[ 1995 c 269 s 2201; 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 206; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 102.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Part headings not law—Severability—1995 c 269: See notes following RCW 18.16.050.

Finding—Intent—Severability—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.